Tennessee statutes. Title 31 Descent And Distribution
Chapter 2

Intestate Succession

31-2-101. Intestate estate.

When any person dies intestate, after the payment of debts and charges against the estate, the deceased's property passes to the deceased's heirs as prescribed in the following sections of this chapter.

Any part of the estate of a decedent not effectively disposed of by the deceased's will passes to the deceased's heirs in the same manner.

Acts 1977, ch. 25, § 2; T.C.A., § 31-201.

Cross-References. Application for alcoholic beverage license or permit by intestate successor, § 57-5-108.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 1, 31, 255, 441, 444, 449, 503, 619, 659, 808, 819.

Law Reviews.

Decedent's Estates: The Rights of Adopted Persons Under Tennessee's Descent and Distribution and Adoption Statutes to Take by Intestate Succession or by Will or Trust, 22 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 339 (1992).

Descent and Distribution — Fraudulent Conveyances — Intent to Deprive Surviving Spouse of His or Her Distributive or Elective Share, 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 551 (1983).

Intestate Succession in Tennessee (Douglas P. Quay), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 63 (1978).

Marital Deduction Planning Under the Tax Reform Act of 1976 (Ronald S. Borod, William H. Lawson, Jr., Clayton D. Smith), 7 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 181 (1977).

Property Law — Wills — Effect of Lapsed Residuary Gifts in the State of Tennessee, 73 Tenn L. Rev. 711 (2006).

The Parent-Child Relationship Under Intestacy Statutes (Susan N. Gary), 32 U. Mem. L. Rev. 643 (2002).

31-2-102. Dower and curtesy abolished.

Dower and curtesy, as formerly known, are abolished. This section shall neither abridge nor affect rights that have vested before April 1, 1977.

Acts 1976, ch. 529, § 1; 1977, ch. 25, §§ 4, 5; T.C.A., § 31-202.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 426, 460, 647, 650, 810, 811, 943.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Curtesy, § 1; 9 Tenn. Juris., Descent and Distribution, §§ 8, 9, 12; 10 Tenn. Juris., Dower, § 1; 18 Tenn. Juris., Marriage, § 6; 18 Tenn. Juris., Mandamus, § 6; 18 Tenn. Juris., Marriage Contracts and Settlements, § 3; 20 Tenn. Juris., Partition, § 14; 21 Tenn. Juris., Redemption of Real Estate Sold for Debt, § 32; 24 Tenn. Juris., Vendor and Purchaser, § 46; 25 Tenn. Juris., Waste, § 1; 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, § 166.

Law Reviews.

Intestate Succession in Tennessee (Douglas P. Quay), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 63 (1978).

Protection Against Spousal Disinheritance: A Critical Analysis of Tennessee's New Forced Share System, 28 U. Mem. L. Rev. 561 (1998).

Survey of Tennessee Property Law, II. Estates in General (Toxey H. Sewell), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 161 (1979).

31-2-103. Vesting of estate — Net estate.

The real property of an intestate decedent shall vest immediately upon death of the decedent in the heirs as provided in § 31-2-104. The real property of a testate decedent vests immediately upon death in the beneficiaries named in the will, unless the will contains a specific provision directing the real property to be administered as part of the estate subject to the control of the personal representative. Upon qualifying, the personal representative shall be vested with the personal property of the decedent for the purpose of first paying administration expenses, taxes, and funeral expenses and then for the payment of all other debts or obligations of the decedent as provided in § 30-2-317. If the decedent's personal property is insufficient for the discharge or payment of a decedent's obligations, the personal representative may utilize the decedent's real property in accordance with title 30, chapter 2, part 4. After payment of debts and charges against the estate, the personal representative shall distribute the personal property of an intestate decedent to the decedent's heirs as prescribed in § 31-2-104, and the property of a testate decedent to the distributees as prescribed in the decedent's will.

Acts 1977, ch. 25, § 3; 1978, ch. 763, §§ 4, 5; T.C.A., § 31-602; Acts 1985, ch. 140, § 27.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 650, 810, 816.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 9 Tenn. Juris., Descent and Distribution, § 5; 10 Tenn. Juris., Equitable Conversion, § 5; 12 Tenn. Juris., Executors and Administrators, § 24; 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, § 166.

Law Reviews.

Conveyances Affecting the Surviving Spouse's Elective Share: Tennessee's Past and a Look to the Future, 57 Tenn. L. Rev. 677 (1990).

Decedent's Estates — Bilbrey v. Smithers: Limitations on Post-Death Claims for Purposes of Intestate Succession in Tennessee, 27 U. Mem. L. Rev. 517 (1997).

Survey of Tennessee Property Law, II. Estates in General (Toxey H. Sewell), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 161 (1979).

Survey of Tennessee Property Law, V. Trusts (Beverly A. Rowlett), 48 Tenn. L. Rev. 95 (1981).

Vesting of Title in Probate Estate: The Curious Meaning of Words (Dan Holbrook), 38 No. 12 Tenn. B.J. 26 (2002).

31-2-104. Share of surviving spouse and heirs.

The intestate share of the surviving spouse is:

If there is no surviving issue of the decedent, the entire intestate estate; or

If there are surviving issue of the decedent, either one-third (1/3) or a child's share of the entire intestate estate, whichever is greater.

The part of the intestate estate not passing to the surviving spouse under subsection (a) or the entire intestate estate if there is no surviving spouse, passes as follows:

To the issue of the decedent; if they are all of the same degree of kinship to the decedent they take equally, but if of unequal degree, then those of more remote degree take by representation;

If there is no surviving issue, to the decedent's parent or parents equally;

If there is no surviving issue or parent, to the brothers and sisters and the issue of each deceased brother and sister by representation; if there is no surviving brother or sister, the issue of brothers and sisters take by representation; or

If there is no surviving issue, parent, or issue of a parent, but the decedent is survived by one or more grandparents or issue of grandparents, half of the estate passes to the paternal grandparents if both survive, or to the surviving paternal grandparent or to the issue of the paternal grandparents if both are deceased, the issue taking equally if they are all of the same degree of kinship to the decedent, but if of unequal degree those of more remote degree take by representation; and the other half passes to the maternal relatives in the same manner; but if there is no surviving grandparent or issue of grandparent on either the paternal or maternal side, the entire estate passes to the relatives on the other side in the same manner as the half.

Acts 1976, ch. 538, § 1; 1977, ch. 25, § 4; 1978, ch. 763, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 31-203, 31-204.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 219, § 1 provided that, notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the spouse of an intestate decedent may elect to take the intestate share provided pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, or may elect to take an elective-share amount to be determined in accordance with the percentages set out in § 31-4-101.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 549, 810, 812, 816, 817, 824, 825, 830.

Law Reviews.

Intestate Succession in Tennessee (Douglas P. Quay), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 63 (1978).

Marital Deduction Planning Under the Tax Reform Act of 1976 (Ronald S. Borod, William H. Lawson, Jr., Clayton D. Smith), 7 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 181 (1977).

New-Age Babies and Age-Old Laws: The Need for an Intent-Based Approach in Tennessee to Preserve Parent-Child Succession for Children of Assisted Reproductive Technology (Jane Marie Lewis), 43 U. Mem. L. Rev. 479 (2012).

Some Order Out of Chaos in Wrongful Death Law (T. A. Smedley), 37 Vand. L. Rev. 273 (1984).

Some Whys and Wherefores of Will-Drafting — Revised (Robert L. McMurray), 15 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 2 (1979).

Survey of Tennessee Property Law, II. Estates in General (Toxey H. Sewell), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 161 (1979).

31-2-105. Establishment of parent-child relationship to determine succession.

If, for purposes of inheritance under a will or trust or by intestate succession or contract, a relationship of parent and child must be established to determine succession by, through, or from a person:

An adopted person is the child of an adopting parent and not of the natural parents, except that adoption of a child by the spouse of a natural parent has no effect on the relationship between the child and that natural parent; and

In cases not covered by subdivision (a)(1), a person born out of wedlock is a child of the mother. That person is also a child of the father, if:

The natural parents participated in a marriage ceremony before or after the birth of the child, even though the attempted marriage is void; or

The paternity is established by adjudication before the death of the father or is established thereafter by clear and convincing proof, but only if an assertion of paternity is made that seeks the adjudication within the earlier of:

The period prescribed in the notice published or posted in accordance with § 30-2-306; or

One (1) year after the father's death;

The paternity established under this subdivision (a)(2)(B) is ineffective to qualify the father or the father's kindred to inherit from or through the child unless the father has openly treated the child as the father's, and has not refused to support the child.

In no event is a parent permitted to inherit through intestate succession or under a will or trust or by contract until all child support arrearages together with any interest owed, at the legal rate of interest computed from the date each payment was due, have been paid in full to the parent ordered to receive support or to the parent's estate if deceased.

Nothing in this section prevents a child from inheriting from a parent through intestate succession.

Acts 1977, ch. 25, § 4; 1978, ch. 763, § 3; T.C.A., § 31-206; Acts 1986, ch. 580, § 5; 1994, ch. 939, § 2; 2017, ch. 290, § 9.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in (a), substituted “purposes of inheritance under a will or trust or by intestate succession or contract,” for “purposes of intestate succession,” in the introductory language, and rewrote (a)(2)(B) which read: “The paternity is established by an adjudication before the death of the father or is established thereafter by clear and convincing proof, but the paternity established under this subdivision (a)(2)(B) is ineffective to qualify the father or the father's kindred to inherit from or through the child unless the father has openly treated the child as the father's, and has not refused to support the child.”; rewrote (b) which read: “In no event shall a parent be permitted to inherit through intestate succession until all child support arrearages together with interest thereon at the legal rate of interest computed from the date each payment was due have been paid in full to the parent ordered to receive support or to the parent's estate if deceased.”; and substituted “prevents a child” for “shall be construed to prevent a child” in (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 290, § 16. July 1, 2017.

Cross-References. Legitimation and paternity, title 36, ch. 2, part 3.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 302, 441, 447, 551, 637, 817, 829.

Law Reviews.

A Critical Survey of Developments in Tennessee Family Law in 1976-77, V. Children (Neil P. Cohen), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 451 (1978).

Decedents' Estates— Bilbrey v. Smithers: Limitations on Post-Death Paternity Claims for Purposes of Intestate Succession in Tennessee, 27 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 517 (1977).

Intestate Succession in Tennessee (Douglas P. Quay), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 63 (1978).

New-Age Babies and Age-Old Laws: The Need for an Intent-Based Approach in Tennessee to Preserve Parent-Child Succession for Children of Assisted Reproductive Technology (Jane Marie Lewis), 43 U. Mem. L. Rev. 479 (2012).

Survey of Tennessee Property Law, II. Estates in General (Toxey H. Sewell), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 161 (1979).

31-2-106. Representation.

If representation is called for by this title, such representation shall be per stirpes.

Acts 1977, ch. 25, § 2; T.C.A., § 31-205.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 824, 825.

Law Reviews.

Intestate Succession in Tennessee (Douglas P. Quay), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 63 (1978).

31-2-107. Kindred of half blood.

Relatives of the half blood inherit the same share they would inherit if they were of the whole blood.

Acts 1977, ch. 25, § 2; T.C.A., § 31-208.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 825, 828.

Law Reviews.

Intestate Succession in Tennessee (Douglas P. Quay), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 63 (1978).

31-2-108. Afterborn heirs.

Relatives of the decedent conceived before the decedent's death but born thereafter inherit as if they had been born in the lifetime of the decedent.

Acts 1977, ch. 25, § 4; T.C.A., § 31-209.

Cross-References. Pretermitted child, § 32-3-103.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 441, 444, 449, 817.

Law Reviews.

New-Age Babies and Age-Old Laws: The Need for an Intent-Based Approach in Tennessee to Preserve Parent-Child Succession for Children of Assisted Reproductive Technology (Jane Marie Lewis), 43 U. Mem. L. Rev. 479 (2012).

31-2-109. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 31-2-109 (Acts 1883, ch. 250, §§ 1, 2; Code 1932, §§ 7189, 7190; Shan., §§ 3661, 3662; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 31-401, 31-402), concerning distribution to aliens, was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 854, § 17.

31-2-110. Escheat.

If there is no taker under this chapter, the intestate estate shall escheat to the state under chapter 6 of this title.

Acts 1977, ch. 25, § 2; T.C.A., § 31-207.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 152.

Law Reviews.

Intestate Succession in Tennessee (Douglas P. Quay), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 63 (1978).